Nebraska, session 109, LB539.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB539 LB539
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 69-2403, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2403 (1) Except as provided in this section and section 69-2409,
a person shall not purchase, lease, rent, or receive transfer of a
handgun until he or she has obtained a certificate in accordance with
section 69-2404. Except as provided in this section and section 69-2409,
a person shall not sell, lease, rent, or transfer a handgun to a person
who has not obtained a certificate.
(2) The certificate shall not be required if:
(a) The person acquiring the handgun is a licensed firearms dealer
under federal law;
(b) The handgun is an antique handgun;
(c) The person acquiring the handgun is authorized to do so on
behalf of a law enforcement agency;
(d) The transfer is a temporary transfer of a handgun and the
transferee remains (i) in the line of sight of the transferor or (ii)
within the premises of an established shooting facility;
(e) The transfer is between a person and his or her spouse, sibling,
parent, child, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, or grandparent;
(f) The person acquiring the handgun is a holder of a valid permit
under the Concealed Handgun Permit Act; or
(g) The person acquiring the handgun is a peace officer as defined
in section 69-2429.
Sec. 2. Section 69-2409.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2409.01 (1)(a) (1) For purposes of criminal history record
information checks relating to firearms or explosives sections 69-2401 to
69-2425, the Nebraska State Patrol shall be furnished with only such
information as may be necessary for the purposes sole purpose of
determining whether an individual is:
(i) Qualified to receive a permit to carry a concealed handgun under
-2-

LB539 LB539
2025 2025
section 69-2433; or
(ii) Disqualified disqualified from purchasing or possessing
firearms or explosives a handgun pursuant to state or federal law or is
subject to the disability provisions of 18 U.S.C. 922(d)(4) and (g)(4).
(b) Such information shall be furnished by the Department of Health
and Human Services. The clerks of the various courts shall furnish to the
Department of Health and Human Services and Nebraska State Patrol, as
soon as practicable but within thirty days after an order of commitment
or discharge is issued or after removal of firearm-related disabilities
pursuant to section 71-963, all information necessary to set up and
maintain the database required by this section. This information shall
include (a) information regarding those persons who:
(i) Are disqualified from purchasing or possessing firearms or
explosives pursuant to state or federal law, including, but not limited
to, 18 U.S.C. 922(d)(4) and (g)(4);
(ii) Are are currently receiving mental health treatment pursuant to
a commitment order of a mental health board or who have been
discharged; ,
(iii) Have (b) information regarding those persons who have been
committed to treatment pursuant to section 29-3702; , and
(iv) Meet the definition of adjudicated as a mental defective or
committed to a mental institution pursuant to 27 C.F.R. 478.11; and
(v) Have (c) information regarding those persons who have had
firearm-related disabilities removed pursuant to section 71-963.
(c) The mental health board shall notify the Department of Health
and Human Services and the Nebraska State Patrol when an individual's
firearm-related such disabilities have been removed pursuant to section
71-963.
(d) The department Department of Health and Human Services shall
also maintain in the database a listing of persons committed to treatment
pursuant to section 29-3702.
-3-

LB539 LB539
2025 2025
(e) To ensure the accuracy of the database, any information
maintained or disclosed under this subsection shall be updated,
corrected, modified, or removed, as appropriate, and as soon as
practicable, from any database that the state or federal government
maintains and makes available to the National Instant Criminal Background
Check System. The procedures for furnishing the information shall
guarantee that no information is released beyond what is necessary for
purposes of this section.
(2) In order to comply with sections 69-2401 and 69-2403 to 69-2408
and this section, the Nebraska State Patrol shall provide to the chief of
police or sheriff of an applicant's place of residence or a licensee in
the process of a criminal history record check pursuant to section
69-2411 only the information regarding whether or not the applicant is
disqualified from purchasing or possessing a handgun.
(3) Any person, agency, or mental health board participating in good
faith in the reporting or disclosure of records and communications under
this section is immune from any liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise,
that might result by reason of the action.
(4) Any person who intentionally causes the Nebraska State Patrol to
request information pursuant to this section without reasonable belief
that the named individual has submitted a written application under
section 69-2404 or 69-2430 or is otherwise subject to a criminal history
record information check pursuant to law has completed a consent form
under section 69-2410 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor in
addition to other civil or criminal liability under state or federal law.
(5) The Nebraska State Patrol and the Department of Health and Human
Services shall report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature on a
biannual basis the following information about the database: (a) The
number of total records of persons unable to purchase or possess firearms
because of disqualification or disability shared with the National
Instant Criminal Background Check System; (b) the number of shared
-4-

LB539 LB539
2025 2025
records by category of such persons; (c) the change in number of total
shared records and change in number of records by category from the
previous six months; (d) the number of records existing but not able to
be shared with the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
because the record was incomplete and unable to be accepted by the
National Instant Criminal Background Check System; and (e) the number of
hours or days, if any, during which the database was unable to share
records with the National Instant Criminal Background Check System and
the reason for such inability. The report shall also be published on the
websites of the Nebraska State Patrol and the Department of Health and
Human Services.
Sec. 3. Section 69-2410, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2410 No importer, manufacturer, or dealer licensed pursuant to 18
U.S.C. 923 shall sell or deliver any handgun to another person other than
a licensed importer, manufacturer, dealer, or collector until he or she
has:
(1) (1)(a) Inspected a valid certificate issued to such person
pursuant to sections 69-2401, 69-2403 to 69-2408, and 69-2409.01; and
(2) (b) Inspected a valid identification containing a photograph of
such person which appropriately and completely identifies such person. ;
or
(2)(a) Obtained a completed consent form from the potential buyer or
transferee, which form shall be established by the Nebraska State Patrol
and provided by the licensed importer, manufacturer, or dealer. The form
shall include the name, address, date of birth, gender, race, and country
of citizenship of such potential buyer or transferee. If the potential
buyer or transferee is not a United States citizen, the completed consent
form shall contain the potential buyer's or transferee's place of birth
and his or her alien or admission number;
(b) Inspected a valid identification containing a photograph of the
-5-

LB539 LB539
2025 2025
potential buyer or transferee which appropriately and completely
identifies such person;
(c) Requested by toll-free telephone call or other electromagnetic
communication that the Nebraska State Patrol conduct a criminal history
record check; and
(d) Received a unique approval number for such inquiry from the
Nebraska State Patrol indicating the date and number on the consent form.
Sec. 4. Section 69-2420, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2420 Any person who, in connection with the purchase, transfer,
or attempted purchase of a handgun pursuant to section sections 69-2410
to 69-2423, knowingly and intentionally makes any materially false oral
or written statement or knowingly and intentionally furnishes any false
identification intended or likely to deceive the licensee shall be guilty
of a Class IV felony.
Sec. 5. Original sections 69-2403, 69-2409.01, 69-2410, and
69-2420, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 6. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
69-2409, 69-2411, 69-2412, 69-2413, 69-2414, 69-2415, 69-2416, 69-2417,
69-2418, 69-2419, and 69-2423, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-6-